California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(5) The independent regional organization maintains an office of public participation to provide information and education to members of the public about issues and initiatives at the independent regional organization, including facilitating engagement in those processes.

(6) In addition to any independent market monitoring activity required by a Federal Energy Regulatory Commission order, the independent regional organization maintains access to independent market analysis for the governing board of the independent regional organization on the impacts of market
 dynamics or rule changes to minimize overall costs to end-use consumers.

(7) Subject to reasonable confidentiality provisions, market data is available to the commission and the Public Advocate’s Office of the Public Utilities Commission, and other states’ commissions and public advocate offices, to the same or greater extent as existed on December 31, 2024, for the markets governed by the Independent System Operator.

(8) There is a stakeholder process designed to provide nonbinding advice to the governing board of the independent regional organization.

(9) The independent regional organization is obligated to conduct meetings and make decisions in an open process with transparent, documented rationales, and all meetings of the governing board of the independent regional organization are publicly noticed and,
 excluding executive sessions, are available to remote participants, recorded and posted on the independent regional organization’s internet website, open to the public, and subject to open record requirements. The obligations in this paragraph shall be substantially similar to those that apply to the Independent System Operator at the time a resolution is adopted pursuant to subdivision (b).

(10) The Independent System Operator continues to operate the energy markets, subject to the market rules determined by the independent regional organization as accepted by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

(11) The market rules of the independent regional organization provide greenhouse gas emissions information and protocols sufficient to enable compliance with the requirements of any state agency.

(12) All independent
 regional organization services are offered on a voluntary basis with each participant retaining its decisionmaking autonomy regarding the extent of its participation.

(13) The tariff approved by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission for the independent regional organization provides a procedure for unilateral withdrawal from the independent regional organization’s energy markets by any participant on their own accord, or as required by an applicable regulatory authority or state statute, with reasonable prior notice and without any penalties, unreasonable costs, or further discretionary approvals.

(b) On or after January 1, 2028, the Independent System Operator may implement tariff modifications accepted by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission to operate the energy markets whose rules are governed by an independent regional organization, as provided in subdivision (a), if
 the governing board of the Independent System Operator has adopted a resolution finding that each of the requirements of paragraphs (1) to (13), inclusive, of subdivision (a) have been or will be adopted by the independent regional organization. The governing board of the Independent System Operator may adopt the resolution if the Independent System Operator satisfies all of the following requirements before adopting the resolution:

(1) The meeting is open to the public, available to remote participants, recorded, and posted on the Independent System Operator’s internet website.

(2) The Independent System Operator issues a notice of the meeting and proposed findings not less than 90 days before the meeting.

(3) The notice explains the basis for finding that each requirement of paragraphs (1) to (13), inclusive, of
 subdivision (a) will be met.

(4) The notice provides an opportunity for written comments on the proposed findings.

(5) The Independent System Operator issues written responses to any comments not less than 20 days before the meeting.

(6) After issuing the written responses described in paragraph (5), but before adopting the resolution, the Independent System Operator shall offer to provide testimony to the legislative committee in each house of the Legislature with primary jurisdiction over electrical corporations on its proposed findings and responses and shall provide testimony to hearings of those committees if those committees request testimony.

(7) The Independent System Operator receives and accepts written comments from the commission, Public
 Advocate’s Office, and Energy Commission provided pursuant to paragraph (4) regarding the proposed findings.

(c) The commission shall make a determination through a formal decision in an existing or new proceeding that the requirements in subdivisions (a) and (b) have been satisfied before electrical corporations participate in an energy market governed by an independent regional organization.

(d) This section does not diminish the commission’s authority to direct an electrical corporation to withdraw from an energy market governed by an independent regional organization. The commission may direct an electrical corporation to withdraw from an energy market governed by an independent regional organization on its own volition through a proceeding or any other commission process, including if the commission identifies any activities of the independent regional organization that would
 undermine or jeopardize the commission’s authority regarding resource adequacy, integrated resource planning, or procuring resources under Section 380, 454.51, or 454.52.

(e) (1) The Independent System Operator shall maintain the necessary technical capability to operate energy markets in a manner that enables California electrical corporations, local publicly owned electric utilities, and other applicable market participants to withdraw from the markets governed by the independent regional organization and instead the Independent System Operator would provide separate market services for those entities.

(2) Beginning one year after the implementation of the independent regional organization’s markets, and annually thereafter, the Independent System Operator, in consultation with the independent regional organization, shall report to the commission, Energy
 Commission, and the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over electrical corporations, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the status of the development and compliance with this section.

(3) The commission and Energy Commission shall review each report required pursuant to paragraph (2) and shall publicly post an acknowledgment to their internet websites that they have reviewed the contents of each report.

(f) (1) The Independent System Operator shall conduct a study of the impacts of implementing subdivision (a) on the creation or retention of jobs in California. The study shall specifically include the impact on jobs constructing and maintaining powerplants in California.

(2) The Independent System Operator shall host public workshops on the study methodology
 and the results of the study.

(3) The Independent System Operator shall complete the study on or before December 31, 2026. Upon completion, the Independent System Operator shall provide the study to the legislative committee in each house of the Legislature with primary jurisdiction over electrical corporations.

(4) The results of the study shall be included in the Independent System Operator’s findings and resolution described in subdivision (b).

(5) The study submitted pursuant to paragraph (3) shall be in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(g) (1) The Independent System Operator shall continue its functions and responsibilities as a balancing authority as they existed before enactment of this section, and
 maintain compliance with applicable reliability standards as developed, adopted, and enforced by the North American Electric Reliability Corporation, the Western Electricity Coordinating Council, or the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

(2) The Independent System Operator shall not change its balancing authority area from that which existed on December 31, 2024, except as follows:

(A) Standard addition or removal of transmission lines, substations, and other equipment by participating transmission owners or other asset owners.

(B) The Independent System Operator may combine its balancing authority area with another California balancing authority if the combination is mutually agreed upon.

(C) The Independent System Operator may use its subscriber
 participating transmission owner tariff.

(3) Except as provided in subdivision (a) with respect to managing energy markets as provided in this section, this section does not change the responsibilities of the Independent System Operator under Section 345.5, including managing the transmission grid, planning for transmission expansion, reliability, resource adequacy, and complying with Section 25308 of the Public Resources Code.

(h) (1) (A) This section does not change any requirement related to the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program as provided in Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11).

(B) The independent regional organization is not a California balancing authority.

(C) The geographic
 footprint of the independent regional organization is not a balancing authority area.

(2) This section does not change the policy of the state to reach specified targets by specified dates for supplying eligible renewable energy resources and zero-carbon resources as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 454.53.

(3) This section does not change the authority of the commission regarding resource adequacy, integrated resource planning, or procuring resources under Section 380, 454.51, 454.52, or any other law.

(4) This section does not change the authority of the commission over an electrical corporation’s participation in any additional products or services offered by the independent regional organization and the electrical corporations shall not participate in any additional products and services offered by the
 independent regional organization unless authorized by the commission.

(i) The Independent System Operator may act as a vendor, through a contract with the independent regional organization, of market operation services, generation dispatch services, transmission operation services, transmission planning services, reliability coordination, balancing authority compliance or operation services, or other electrical system services.

(j) This section does not prohibit the independent regional organization from offering additional products or services on a voluntary basis, including, but not limited to, cooptimization of ancillary services, administration of a resource adequacy program, or transmission planning or service.

(k) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Balancing authority,” “balancing authority area,” and “California balancing authority” have the same meanings as provided in Section 399.12.

(2) “Load-serving entity” has the same meaning as provided in Section 380.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 116, Sec. 4.   (AB 825)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

346.

The Independent System Operator shall immediately participate in all relevant Federal Energy Regulatory Commission proceedings. The Independent System Operator shall ensure that additional filings at the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission request confirmation of the relevant provisions of this chapter and seek the authority needed to give the Independent System Operator the ability to secure generating and transmission resources necessary to guarantee achievement of planning and operating reserve criteria no less stringent than those established by the Western
 Electricity Coordinating Council and the North American Electric Reliability Council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 258.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

347.

The Independent System Operator governing board may form appropriate technical advisory committees composed of market and nonmarket participants to advise the Independent System Operator governing board on issues including, but not limited to, rules and protocols and operating procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 854, Sec. 10.   Effective September 24, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

348.

The Independent System Operator shall adopt inspection, maintenance, repair, and replacement standards for the transmission facilities under its control no later than September 30, 1997. The standards, which shall be performance or prescriptive standards, or both, as appropriate, for each substantial type of transmission equipment or facility, shall provide for high quality, safe, and reliable service. In adopting its standards, the Independent System Operator shall consider: cost, local geography and weather, applicable codes, national electric industry practices,
 sound engineering judgment, and experience. The Independent System Operator shall also adopt standards for reliability, and safety during periods of emergency and disaster. The Independent System Operator shall report to the Oversight Board, at such times as the Oversight Board may specify, on the development and implementation of the standards in relation to facilities under the operational control of the Independent System Operator. The Independent System Operator shall require each transmission facility owner or operator to report annually on its compliance with the standards. That report shall be made available to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 261, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

349.

(a) The Independent System Operator shall perform a review following a major outage that affects at least 10 percent of the customers of the entity providing the local distribution service. The review shall address the cause of the major outage, the response time and effectiveness, and whether the transmission facility owner or operator’s operation and maintenance practices enhanced or undermined the ability to restore service efficiently and in a timely manner.

(b) (1) If the Independent System Operator finds pursuant to subdivision (a) that the operation and maintenance practices of the transmission facility owner or operator prolonged the response time or was responsible for the outage, the Independent
 System Operator may order appropriate sanctions, subject to the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission approving that authority.

(2) (A) If the Independent System Operator finds pursuant to subdivision (a) that the primary cause of the outage was the insufficiency of the electricity supply available to serve the electrical load within its balancing area authority, the Independent System Operator shall post on its internet website the finding and recommendations to prevent future shortfalls and share the finding and recommendations with the commission, the Energy Commission, and the Legislature.

(B) Findings and recommendations submitted to the Legislature shall be provided in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 713, Sec. 3.   (AB 2368)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

349.5.

(a) Beginning January 15, 2002, and at least once monthly thereafter, the Independent System Operator shall notify each air pollution control district and air quality management district of the name and address of each entity within the district’s boundaries within the Independent System Operator’s control area with whom the Independent System Operator enters into an interruptible service contract or similar arrangement.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “interruptible service contract or similar arrangement” means any arrangement in which a nonresidential entity agrees to reduce or consider reducing its electrical consumption during
 periods of peak demand or at the request of the Independent System Operator in exchange for compensation, or for assurances not to be blacked out or other similar nonmonetary assurances.

(c) The local air pollution control district or air quality management district shall maintain in a confidential manner the information received pursuant to this section. However, nothing in this subdivision shall affect the applicability of Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code, or of any other similar open records statute or ordinance, to information provided pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 396.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

350.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, upon approval by the Independent System Operator of each transmission plan produced through the transmission planning process, or a successor process, the Independent System Operator shall report to the commission and the relevant policy committees of both houses of the Legislature any new use of any grid enhancing technology that is deemed reasonable by the Independent System Operator in that plan and the costs and efficiency savings of the deployment of that grid enhancing technology.

(b) The report submitted to the relevant policy committees of the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 741, Sec. 1.   (AB 2779)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

352.5.

(a) The Independent System Operator shall make publicly available a list of all power plants located in the state that are not operational due to a planned or unplanned outage.

(b) For the purposes of complying with subdivision (a), the Independent System Operator shall make the list available over the Internet.

(c) The Independent System Operator shall update the list established pursuant to subdivision (a) on a
 daily basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 6.   Effective January 18, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

352.7.

(a) It shall be unlawful for a person to intentionally disclose proprietary information obtained in the negotiation, execution, or performance of a consulting services contract, as defined in Section 10335.5 of the Public Contract Code, or an information technology contract, as defined in Section 11702 of the Government Code, with the Independent System Operator when the contracting party knew or should have known that the disclosure was likely to cause harm.

(b) A violation of
 this section shall be punishable as a misdemeanor and may be prosecuted by the Attorney General or by a local district attorney in the district in which the disclosure took place.

(c) (1) For the purposes of this section “proprietary information” shall include any information agreed by the contracting parties to be proprietary, or any information that is designated by the Independent System Operator to be proprietary. The Independent System Operator shall provide written notification to a contracting party of any information that, subsequent to the execution of the contract, is identified to be proprietary. The Independent System Operator shall make this designation only in cases where the Independent System Operator has reason to believe that the release of this information poses an immediate threat to the health, safety, or welfare of the public or the Independent System Operator has reason to believe that the
 contracting party intends to sell the information. If the Independent System Operator makes a designation of proprietary information subsequent to the execution of the contract, the Independent System Operator shall make a good faith effort to amend the contract to incorporate the subsequent designation of proprietary information. The Independent System Operator shall specifically identify in the contract any information that is considered to be proprietary. A contracting party is not in violation of this section if that party discloses information prior to the receipt of the written notification.

(2) Any information that is required to be released or disclosed by a contracting party pursuant to a legal requirement, including an order of a court or regulatory agency, shall not be considered a violation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1097, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Distributed Energy Resources [353.1. - 353.15.]

353.1.

As used in this article, “distributed energy resources” means electric generation technology that meets all of the following criteria:

(a) Commences initial operation between May 1, 2001, and June 1, 2003, except that gas-fired distributed energy resources that are not operated in a combined heat and power application shall commence operation no later than September 1, 2002.

(b) Is located within a single facility.

(c) Is five megawatts or smaller in aggregate capacity.

(d) Serves onsite loads or over-the-fence transactions allowed under Sections 216 and 218.

(e) Is powered by any fuel other than diesel.

(f) Complies with emission standards and guidance adopted by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to Sections 41514.9 and 41514.10 of the Health and Safety Code. Prior to the adoption of those standards and guidance, for the purpose of this article, distributed energy resources shall meet emission levels equivalent to nine parts per million oxides of nitrogen, or the equivalent standard taking into account efficiency as determined by the State Air Resources Board, averaged over a three-hour period, or best available control technology for the applicable air district, whichever is lower, except for distributed generation units that displace and therefore significantly reduce emissions from natural gas flares or reinjection compressors, as determined by the State Air Resources Board. These units shall comply with the applicable best available control technology as determined by the air pollution control district or air quality management district in which they are located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 193.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

353.2.

(a) As used in this article, “ultraclean and low-emission distributed generation” means any electric generation technology that meets both of the following criteria:

(1) Commences initial operation between January 1, 2003, and December 31, 2008.

(2) Produces zero emissions during its operation or produces emissions during its operation that are equal to or less than the 2007 State Air Resources Board emission limits for distributed generation, except that technologies operating by combustion must operate in a combined heat and power application with a 60-percent system efficiency on a higher heating value.

(b) In establishing rates and fees, the commission may consider energy efficiency and emissions performance to encourage early compliance with air quality standards established by the State Air Resources Board for ultraclean and low-emission distributed generation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 167.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

353.3.

(a) The commission shall require each electrical corporation under the operational control of the Independent System Operator as of January 1, 2001, to modify its tariffs so that all customers installing new distributed energy resources in accordance with the criteria described in Section 353.1 are served under rates, rules, and requirements identical to those of a customer within the same rate schedule that does not use distributed energy resources, and to withdraw any provisions in otherwise applicable tariffs that activate other tariffs, rates, or rules if a customer uses distributed energy resources.

(b) To qualify for the tariffs described in subdivision (a), each customer with distributed energy resources that meet the criteria of Section 353.1 shall participate in a real-time metering and pricing program, when these programs become available, in which rates for any energy purchased from the electrical corporation reflect the actual cost to the electrical corporation of energy it purchases at the time it is consumed by the customer. Prior to the time these programs become available, the customer shall participate in a time-of-use pricing tariff. On or before December 31, 2001, the commission shall adopt a real time pricing tariff for the purpose of this section.

(c) Except as specified in Section 353.7, customers may not be subject to the application of additional rates or tariffs solely because of their use of distributed energy resources to serve onsite loads or over-the-fence transactions allowed under Sections 216 and 218.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 11.   Effective May 22, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

353.5.

Each electrical corporation, as part of its distribution planning process, shall consider nonutility owned distributed energy resources as a possible alternative to investments in its distribution system in order to ensure reliable electric service at the lowest possible cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 11.   Effective May 22, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

353.7.

Notwithstanding Section 353.3, nothing in this article may result in any exemption from reasonable interconnection charges, lead to any reduction in contributions by each customer class to public purpose programs funded under Section 399.8, or relieve any customer of any obligation determined by the commission to result from participation in the purchase of power through the Department of Water Resources pursuant to Division 27 (commencing with Section 80000) of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 11.   Effective May 22, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

353.9.

In establishing the rates required under this article, the commission shall create a firewall that segregates distribution cost recovery so that any net costs, taking into account the actual costs and benefits of distributed energy resources, proportional to each customer class, as determined by the commission, resulting from the tariff modifications granted to members of each customer class may be recovered only from that class.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 11.   Effective May 22, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

353.11.

A local publicly owned electric utility or a local publicly owned utility otherwise providing electrical service, shall review at the earliest practicable date its rates, tariffs, and rules to identify barriers to and determine the appropriate balance of costs and benefits of distributed energy resources in order to facilitate the installation of these resources in the interests of their customer-owners and the state, and shall hold at least one noticed public meeting to solicit public comment on the review and any recommended changes. However, notwithstanding any other provision of this article, such an entity has the sole authority to undertake such a review and to make modifications to its rates, tariffs, and rules as the governing body of that utility determines to be necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 558, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

353.13.

(a) The commission shall require each electrical corporation to establish new tariffs on or before January 1, 2003, for customers using distributed energy resources, including, but not limited to, those that do not meet all of the criteria described in Section 353.1. However, after January 1, 2003, distributed energy resources that meet all of the criteria described in Section 353.1 shall continue to be subject only to those tariffs in existence pursuant to Section 353.3, until June 1, 2011, except that installations that do not operate in a combined heat and power application will be subject to those tariffs in existence pursuant to Section 353.3 only until June 1, 2006. Those tariffs required pursuant to this section shall ensure that all net
 distribution costs incurred to serve each customer class, taking into account the actual costs and benefits of distributed energy resources, proportional to each customer class, as determined by the commission, are fully recovered only from that class. The commission shall require each electrical corporation, in establishing those rates, to ensure that customers with similar load profiles within a customer class will, to the extent practicable, be subject to the same utility rates, regardless of their use of distributed energy resources to serve onsite loads or over-the-fence transactions allowed under Sections 216 and 218. Customers with dedicated facilities shall remain responsible for their obligations regarding payment for those facilities.

(b) In establishing the tariffs, the commission shall consider coincident peakload, and the reliability of the onsite generation, as determined by the frequency and duration of outages, so that customers
 with more reliable onsite generation and those that reduce peak demand pay a lower cost-based rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 842, Sec. 9.   (SB 1222)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

353.15.

(a) In order to evaluate the efficiency, emissions, and reliability of distributed energy resources with a capacity greater than 10 kilowatts, customers that install those resources pursuant to this article shall report to the commission, on an annual basis, all of the following information, as recorded on a monthly basis:

(1) Heat rate for the resource.

(2) Total kilowatthours produced in the peak and off-peak periods, as determined by the ISO.

(3) Emissions data for the resource, as required by the State Air Resources Board or the appropriate air
 quality management district or air pollution control district.

(b) The commission shall release the information submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) in a manner that does not identify the individual user of the distributed energy resource.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 842, Sec. 10.   (SB 1222)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Requirements for the Public Utilities Commission [360. - 380.5.]

360.

The commission shall ensure that existing, and if necessary, additional filings at the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission request confirmation of the relevant provisions of this chapter and seek the authority needed to give the Independent System Operator the ability to secure generating and transmission resources necessary to guarantee achievement of planning and operating reserve criteria no less stringent than those established by the Western Electricity Coordinating Council and the North American Electric Reliability Council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 260.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

360.5.

The commission shall determine that portion of each existing electrical corporation’s retail rate effective on January 5, 2001, that is equal to the difference between the generation related component of the retail rate and the sum of the costs of the utility’s own generation, qualifying facility contracts, existing bilateral contracts, and ancillary services. That portion of the retail rate shall be known as the California Procurement Adjustment. The commission shall further determine the amount of the California Procurement Adjustment that is allocable to the power sold by the department. That amount shall be payable, by each electrical corporation, upon receipt by the electrical corporation of the revenues from its retail end use customers, to the department for deposit in the Department of Water Resources Electric Power Fund, established by Section 80200 of the Water Code. The amount determined pursuant to this subdivision shall be known as the Fixed Department of Water Resources Set-Aside.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 2.   Effective February 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

361.

The commission shall ensure that any funds secured by the restructuring trusts established for the purposes of developing the Independent System Operator and the Power Exchange shall be placed at the disposal of the Independent System Operator and the Power Exchange respectively.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 854, Sec. 10.   Effective September 24, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

362.

(a) In proceedings pursuant to Section 455.5, 851, or 854, the commission shall ensure that facilities needed to maintain the reliability of the electric supply remain available and operational, consistent with maintaining open competition and avoiding an overconcentration of market power. In order to determine whether the facility needs to remain available and operational, the commission shall use standards that are no less stringent than the Western Electricity Coordinating Council and North American Electric Reliability Council standards for planning reserve criteria.

(b) The commission shall require that generation facilities located in the state that have been disposed of in proceedings pursuant to Section 851 are operated by the persons or corporations who own or control them in a manner that ensures their availability to maintain the reliability of the electric supply system.

(c) Consistent with Section 851 and the commission’s regulation of transfers of operational control of electrical corporation facilities, an electrical corporation subject to commission Decision 98-01-053 (January 21, 1998), Joint Application of Pacific Gas and Electric Company (U 39-E), San Diego Gas and Electric Company (U 902-E), and Southern California Edison Company (U 388-E) for an Order under Public Utilities Code Section 853 Exempting Them from the Provisions of Section 851 or in
 the Alternative for Authority to Convey Operational Control of Designated Transmission Lines and Associated Facilities to an Independent System Operator, shall participate in the Independent System Operator.

(d) An electrical corporation shall not withdraw a facility from the operational control of the Independent System Operator without commission approval pursuant to Section 851.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 24.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

363.

(a) In order to ensure the continued safe and reliable operation of public utility electric generating facilities, the commission shall require in any proceeding under Section 851 involving the sale, but not spinoff, of a public utility electric generating facility, for transactions initiated prior to December 31, 2001, and approved by the commission by December 31, 2002, that the selling utility contract with the purchaser of the facility for the selling utility, an affiliate, or a successor corporation to operate and maintain the facility for at least two years. The commission may require these conditions to be met for transactions initiated on or after January 1, 2002. The commission shall require the contracts to be reasonable for both the seller and the buyer.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall apply only if the facility is actually operated during the two-year period following the sale. Subdivision (a) shall not require the purchaser to operate a facility, nor shall it preclude a purchaser from temporarily closing the facility to make capital improvements.

(c) For those bayside fossil fueled electric generation and associated transmission facilities that an electrical corporation has proposed to divest in a public auction and for which the Legislature has appropriated state funds in the Budget Act of 1998 to assist local governmental entities in acquiring the facilities or to mitigate environmental and community issues, and where the local governmental entity proposes that the closure of the power plant would serve the public interest by mitigating air, water and other environmental, health and safety, and community impacts associated with the facilities, and where the local governmental entity and electrical corporation have engaged in significant negotiations with the purpose of shutting down the power plant, and where there is an agreement between the electrical corporation and the local governmental entity for closure of the facilities or for the local governmental entity to acquire the facilities, the commission shall approve the closure of these facilities or the transfer of these electric generation and associated transmission facilities to the local governmental entity and shall consider the utility transactions with the community to be just and reasonable for its ratepayers. For purposes of calculating the Competition Transition Charge, the commission shall not use any inferred market value for the facilities predicated on the continued use of the plant, the construction of successor facilities or alternative use of the site and shall net the costs of the depreciated book value of the power plant and the unrecovered costs of decommissioning, environmental remediation and site restoration against the net proceeds received from the local governmental entity for the acquisition or closure of the facilities. Thereafter, any net proceeds received from the ultimate disposition, by the electrical corporation, of the site shall be credited to recovery of Competition Transition Charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 328, Sec. 16.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

364.

(a) The commission shall adopt inspection, maintenance, repair, and replacement standards, and shall, in a new proceeding, or new phase of an existing proceeding, to commence on or before July 1, 2015, consider adopting rules to address the physical security risks to the distribution systems of electrical corporations. The standards or rules, which shall be prescriptive or performance based, or both, and may be based on risk management, as appropriate, for each substantial type of distribution equipment or facility, shall provide for high-quality, safe, and reliable service.

(b) In setting its standards or rules, the commission shall consider: cost, local geography and weather, applicable codes, potential physical security
 risks, national electric industry practices, sound engineering judgment, and experience. The commission shall also adopt standards for operation, reliability, and safety during periods of emergency and disaster.

(c) The commission shall conduct a review to determine whether the standards or rules prescribed in this section have been met. If the commission finds that the standards or rules have not been met, the commission may order appropriate sanctions, including penalties in the form of rate reductions or monetary fines. The review shall be performed after every major outage. Any money collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be used to offset funding for the California Alternative Rates for Energy Program.
